Washington statutes.
RCW 18.35.250

Violations—Remedies—Actions on bond or security.

(1) In addition to any other legal remedies, an action may be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction upon the bond, cash deposit, or security in lieu of a surety bond required by this chapter, by any person having a claim against a licensee or interim permit holder, agent, or employee for any violation of this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter. The aggregate liability of the surety, cash deposit, or other negotiable security to all claimants shall in no event exceed the sum of the bond. Claims shall be satisfied in the order of judgment rendered.

(2) An action upon the bond, cash deposit, or other negotiable security shall be commenced by serving and filing a complaint.

[ 2002 c 310 s 25; 2000 c 93 s 4; (2000 c 93 s 3 expired January 1, 2003); 1998 c 142 s 19; 1996 c 200 s 31; 1991 c 3 s 86; 1989 c 198 s 11; 1983 c 39 s 20.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2002 c 310: See note following RCW 18.35.010.

Expiration date—2000 c 93 ss 1 and 3: See note following RCW 18.35.240.

Effective date—2000 c 93 ss 2 and 4: See note following RCW 18.35.240.

Effective date—1998 c 142 ss 1-14 and 16-20: See note following RCW 18.35.010.